Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.886

Unsettled demand for payment—Costs, fees, and expenses of counsel.

(1) The court in a proceeding commenced under RCW 25.10.881 shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the costs against the limited partnership, except that the court may assess the costs against all or some of the dissenters, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds the dissenters acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in demanding payment.

(2) The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the respective parties, in amounts the court finds equitable:

(a) Against the limited partnership and in favor of any or all dissenters if the court finds the limited partnership did not substantially comply with the requirements of this article; or

(b) Against either the limited partnership or a dissenter, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the fees and expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

(3) If the court finds that the services of counsel for any dissenter were of substantial benefit to other dissenters similarly situated, and that the fees for those services should not be assessed against the limited partnership, the court may award to these counsel reasonable fees to be paid out of the amounts awarded the dissenters who were benefited.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1212.]